Washington statutes.
RCW 28C.18.110

Identification of policies and methods to promote efficiency and sharing of resources—Report to governor and legislature.

The board shall, in cooperation with the operating agencies, by January 1, 1996:

(1) Identify policies to reduce administrative and other barriers to efficient operation of the state's workforce development system and barriers to improved coordination of workforce development in the state. These policies shall include waivers of statutory requirements and administrative rules, as well as implementation of one-stop access to workforce development services and school-to-work transition;

(2) Identify ways for operating agencies to share resources, instructors, and curricula through collaboration with other public and private entities to increase training opportunities and reduce costs; and

(3) Report to the governor and the appropriate legislative committees its recommendations for any statutory changes necessary to enhance operational efficiencies or improve coordination. The board shall work with the operating agencies of the state's workforce development system to reduce administrative barriers that do not require statutory changes.

[ 1995 c 130 s 6.]